California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) For meetings held outside Sacramento County, the requirements for public meetings pursuant to this subdivision to eliminate or reduce the level of services, or to restrict the eligibility for services or hear testimony regarding regulations to implement any of these service charges, are satisfied if at least three voting members of the governing board hold the meetings as required and report the testimony from those meetings to the full governing board at its next regular meeting. No action shall be taken at any meeting held outside Sacramento County pursuant to this paragraph.

(i) Records of the County Medical Services Program and of the governing board that relate to rates of payment or to the board’s negotiations with providers of health care services or to the governing board’s deliberative processes regarding either shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(j) The following definitions shall govern the construction of this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) “CMSP” or “program” means the County Medical Services Program, which is the program by which health care services are provided to eligible persons in those counties electing to participate in the
 CMSP pursuant to Section 16809.

(2) “CMSP county” means a county that has elected to participate pursuant to Section 16809 in the CMSP.

(3) “Governing Board” means the County Medical Services Program Governing Board established pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 461.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

16809.5.

(a) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this section shall be allocated on a monthly basis.

(b) Money allocated for the purposes of this section may be used to expand the scope of benefits, to fund special projects which alleviate problems of access to health and dental care under the County Medical Services Program and to compensate hospitals and other emergency health service providers for emergency treatment of out-of-county indigent patients and shall not be used to
 fund existing levels of service.

(c) Funds available from appropriations for the purposes of this chapter may be utilized to fund increased program costs due to caseload increases and provider rate increases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 79.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16812.

The State Department of Health Services, in consultation with the local jurisdictions, shall adopt any regulations necessary to implement this part. The department may adopt these regulations on an emergency basis pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department in order to implement this part shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 201.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16817.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county may enter into contracts with selected providers to provide health care services in expending funds provided pursuant to this part and Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000). The county may negotiate such reimbursement or payment arrangements it desires in such contracts. A county shall not be obligated to pay for health care services unless pursuant to a contract or the county has specifically authorized such services and agreed to payment. All such contracts shall be available for review by the department. A county may require county residents specified in this part and Part
 5 to use county facilities or county selected providers. This section may not be construed to limit a county’s existing obligations to furnish health care. Any county may also elect to act jointly on a regional basis with other counties in assuming the program responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 84.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16818.

(a) Each facility treating persons pursuant to Section 17000 shall provide, at the time treatment is sought, individual notice of the availability of reduced cost health care. In addition, conspicuous posted notices of the procedures for applying for reduced cost health care shall be displayed in all emergency rooms and patient waiting rooms of each facility treating persons pursuant to Section 17000. 

(b) This section is declaratory of existing law and shall not be interpreted to constitute a new mandate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 200.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.7. HEALTH CARE FOR INDIGENTS [16900. - 16996.2.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [16900. - 16908.5.]

16900.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16901.

“CMSP county” means a county that has elected to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 348, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16902.

“Department” means the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16903.

“Fund” means the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16904.

“Hospital services” means services provided by public and private hospitals licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16905.

“MISP county” means a county which administers, either directly or through contracts with selected providers, its own indigent health services program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1170, Sec. 16.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16905.5.

“Obstetric services” means the diagnosis of pregnancy and all other medical services provided by a licensed physician to pregnant women during their pregnancies from the time of conception until 90 days following the end of the month in which the pregnancy ends.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 22.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16906.

“Office” means the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16907.5.

“Pediatric services” means all medical services rendered by any licensed physician to persons from birth to 21 years of age, and shall include attendance at labor and delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 23.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16908.

“Physician services” means services provided by a licensed physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16908.5.

For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 and the funds determined by Section 16932, and distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946, and the application of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 16946 to these funds, all patients which meet the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development’s definition of charity care as prescribed under subdivision (d) of Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code qualify for the use of funds under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 488.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Administration of Funds [16909. - 16909.1.]

16909.

(a) Any county which receives funds pursuant to this part shall deposit them in a special revenue fund or trust fund established solely for this purpose, in a hospital services account, a physician services account, and other county health services account, and any other account or subaccount the department may require, before transferring or expending them for any of the uses allowed in this part.

(b) Any county subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) shall deposit the funds in the special revenue fund or trust fund before transferring the funds to the county emergency medical services fund, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 16933 and Section 16951.

(c) (1) Interest on each fund, account, or subaccount shall accrue to the benefit of the fund, account, or subaccount, and shall be expended for the same purposes as the other funds in the account or subaccount.

(2) Interest or other increments resulting from funds transferred to the county for noncounty hospitals pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 shall be expended under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946.

(d) Counties shall submit a report that displays cost and utilization data for each account in the trust fund established pursuant to this section, to the department on a semiannual, preliminary annual, and final annual basis, in a form prescribed by the department.

(e) Data required by subdivision (d) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) For the Hospital Services Account, the data shall include all of the following:

(A) Inpatient stay, including child health and disability prevention followup treatment, including the following information:

(i) Facility name.

(ii) Amount paid by the county.

(iii) Number of discharges.

(iv) Patient days.

(B) Outpatient visits, including child health and disability prevention followup treatment, including the following information:

(i) Facility name.

(ii) Amount paid by the county.

(iii) Number of visits.

(C) Emergency room.

(i) Facility name.

(ii) Amount paid by the county.

(iii) Number of visits.

(2) For the Physician Services Account, the data shall include all of the following:

(A) Emergency services, including the following information:

(i) The number of providers.

(ii) The number of visits.

(iii) The amount paid by the county.

(B) Obstetrics, including the following information:

(i) The number of providers.

(ii) The number of visits.

(iii) The amount paid by the county.

(C) Pediatrics, including the following information:

(i) The number of providers.

(ii) The number of visits.

(iii) The amount paid by the county.

(D) Child health and disability prevention followup treatment, including the following information:

(i) The number of providers.

(ii) The number of visits.

(iii) The amount paid by the county.

(3) For the other county health services account, the data shall include all of the following:

(A) For funds expended for hospital services, those data in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(B) For funds expended for physician services, those data in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(C) For funds expended for services other than those provided and billed for by a hospital or physician, the data shall include:

(i) The number of providers by type of service.

(ii) The number of visits or units, or both, by type of service.

(iii) The amount paid by the county by type of service.

(D) Child health and disability prevention followup treatment, including the following information:

(i) The number of providers.

(ii) The number of visits.

(iii) The amount paid by the county.

(f) The Director of Health Services shall withhold, in part or in whole, payment of moneys governed by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16930) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16940) of this part to a county, until the reports specified in this section have been submitted to the department in the form and according to the procedures established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 80.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16909.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), county adminstrative costs associated with the administration of each special revenue fund, trust fund, account, or subaccount required by Section 16909 shall be reimbursed from the specific fund, account, or subaccount.

(b) Funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 shall not be reduced or utilized to offset the costs of administering the hospital services account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 430, Sec. 3.   Effective July 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Health Services Reporting [16910. - 16910.]

16910.

(a) (1) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be used for the development and implementation of county medically indigent care reporting systems which will provide data on all persons served and services provided pursuant to Section 17000. 

(2) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be available for implementation of county medically indigent care reporting systems for the 1989–90 and 1990–91 fiscal years and for the first six months of the 1991–92 fiscal year. 

(b) Use of these moneys shall be limited to one-time costs for equipment purchases, system design and development, and necessary system testing and implementation costs. 

(c) Counties shall complete implementation of the medically indigent care reporting system by July 1, 1991, unless an amendment to its existing implementation plan and timeline is approved by the department that ensures full implementation of the county’s medically indigent reporting system no later than December 31, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 278, Sec. 15.   Effective July 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. County Reporting Requirements [16915. - 16916.]

16915.

(a) Any county receiving an allocation pursuant to this part shall, at a minimum, report to the department all indigent health care program demographic, expenditure, and utilization data, in a manner that will provide an unduplicated count of users, as follows:

(1) The following patient demographic data:

(A) Age.

(B) Sex.

(C) Ethnicity.

(D) Family size.

(E) Monthly income.

(F) Source of income, according to the following categories:

(i) Disability income.

(ii) Employment.

(iii) Retirement.

(iv) General assistance.

(v) Other.

(G) Type of employment, according to the following categories:

(i) Agriculture.

(ii) Labor and production.

(iii) Professional and technical.

(iv) Service.

(v) Nonemployed.

(H) Payer source, according to the following categories:

(i) Private insurance.

(ii) County program.

(iii) Self-pay.

(iv) Other.

(I) ZIP Code of residence.

(2) Indigent health care expenditure data, including all of the following:

(A) Inpatient hospital services, according to the following categories:

(i) County hospital.

(ii) Contract hospital.

(iii) University teaching hospital.

(iv) Other, noncontract hospital.

(v) Diagnostic category, as defined by the International Classification of Diseases, 9th Revision, Clinical Modification (ICD-9-CM).

(B) Outpatient services, according to the following categories:

(i) Hospital outpatient.

(ii) Freestanding community clinic.

(iii) Primary care physician.

(iv) Nonemergency services rendered in an emergency room environment.

(v) Type of service.

(C) Emergency room services, according to the following categories:

(i) Emergency services.

(ii) Emergency services which result in a hospital admission.

(iii) Emergency services, which are rendered in a noncounty, noncontract hospital and result in a transfer of the patient to a county or contract hospital.

(3) Indigent health care utilization data.

(A) Inpatient hospital services, according to the following categories:

(i) County hospital days and discharges.

(ii) Contract hospital days and discharges.

(iii) University teaching hospital days and discharges.

(iv) Other, noncontract hospital days and discharges.

(B) Outpatient services, according to the following categories:

(i) Hospital outpatient visits.

(ii) Freestanding community clinic visits.

(iii) Primary care physician visits.

(iv) Visits to a hospital emergency room for nonemergency services.

(C) Emergency room services, according to the following categories:

(i) Visits for emergency services in a county hospital.

(ii) Visits for emergency services in a contract hospital.

(iii) Visits for emergency services in a noncounty, noncontract hospital.

(iv) Visits for emergency services which result in an admission in a county hospital.

(v) Visits for emergency services which result in an admission to a contract hospital.

(vi) Visits for emergency services which result in an admission to a noncounty, noncontract hospital.

(D) Visits for emergency services which are rendered in a noncounty, noncontract hospital and result in a transfer of the patient to a county or contract hospital.

(4) Geographic location of rendered services.

(A) Inpatient hospital services, according to the following categories:

(i) County hospital.

(ii) Contract hospital.

(iii) University teaching hospital.

(iv) Other, noncontract hospital.

(B) Outpatient services, according to the following categories:

(i) Hospital outpatient.

(ii) Freestanding community clinic.

(iii) Primary care physician.

(iv) Nonemergency services rendered in an emergency room environment.

(C) Emergency room services.

(5) Expenditure and utilization data for persons with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) and AIDS-related complex.

(A) Total number of patients.

(B) Number of inpatient users.

(C) Number of discharges.

(D) Total inpatient days.

(E) Total inpatient expenditures.

(F) Number of outpatient users.

(G) Number of outpatient visits.

(H) Total outpatient expenditures.

(I) Number of emergency room users.

(J) Number of emergency room visits.

(K) Total emergency room expenditures.

(b) Counties shall report demographic, cost and utilization data on indigent health care to the department as follows:

(1) An actual annual report no later than 360 days after the last day of the year to be reported.

(2) Counties shall maintain all patient-specific data collected through the medically indigent care reporting system for a period of 24 months after the last day of the fiscal year for which the data was collected.

(3) Reports shall be submitted on machine readable media, on 514 inch or 312 inch diskette, in the format specified by the department.

(c) Counties that are eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 that do not operate a county hospital and that elect to enter into a contract with the department to administer the noncounty hospital portion of the Hospital Services Account, pursuant to Section 16934.7, and the Physician Services Account, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16952, are not required to report indigent health care program demographic, cost, and utilization data pursuant to this section.

(d) The department shall collect the data specified in subdivision (a) for services paid for through the hospital contract-back and physician services contract-back programs specified in Section 16934.7 and subdivision (c) of Section 16952.

(e) The data specified in subparagraphs (D), (E), (F), and (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for services paid for with funds specified under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 and funds administered pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 16951) of Chapter 5 are not required to be reported to the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 20.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16916.

The department shall withhold payments to a county pursuant to this part if the county fails to provide the reports and data required by this chapter according to the schedule specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16915.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1170, Sec. 18.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Uncompensated Care Assistance [16920. - 16924.]

16920.

(a) It is the intention of the Legislature to appropriate a portion of the 1988–89 fiscal year one-time revenues from the Hospital Services Account for distribution to each county and noncounty hospital which provides uncompensated care to unsponsored patients, with payments based upon the proportion of each hospital’s share of the 1988 calendar year statewide total of uncompensated care rendered to unsponsored patients.

(b) It is the intention of the Legislature to partially and proportionately compensate each hospital that provides care to unsponsored patients and to provide an economic incentive for all hospitals to provide, maintain, and enhance access to care.

(c) For purposes of this section, “uncompensated care charges” means the sum of the charges related to patients falling within charity care and 50 percent of bad debts, as reported quarterly to the office pursuant to Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code. The office shall use the data as published by the office for each quarter of 1988.

(d) As used in this section, “uncompensated care costs” means that amount calculated by applying an overall hospital cost-to-charge ratio, calculated by dividing gross operating expenses by gross inpatient and outpatient revenue, as reported quarterly to the office, to uncompensated charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 489.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16921.

Funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be allocated and disbursed to county and noncounty hospitals which meet any of the following requirements:

(a) Operate an emergency room pursuant to Section 1317 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Adhere to the emergency care requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 1317 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Treat county indigent patients.

(d) Are childrens’ hospitals for purposes of this part.

(e) Are small and rural hospitals as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 490.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16922.

(a) In order to determine the allocation for each eligible hospital of the amount appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, the office shall do all of the following:

(1) Compute the total uncompensated care costs for each eligible hospital.

(2) Compute the total uncompensated care costs for all eligible hospitals.

(3) Divide each hospital’s uncompensated care costs as computed in paragraph (1) by the total uncompensated care costs as computed in paragraph (2).

(b) The result shall be multiplied by the total funds specified for hospital payments pursuant to Section 16921 to determine each hospital’s payment for uncompensated care. That amount shall be allocated in one lump sum to each hospital by the Controller pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 50, Sec. 15.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16923.

The office shall do all of the following:

(a) Review and process the quarterly financial and utilization data report and calculate the distribution to be made within 30 days after October 2, 1989.

(b) Make the calculations available to the Controller within 40 days after October 2, 1989.

(c) Incorporate the quarterly financial and utilization data reports into the field audit function currently utilized by the office.

(d) Develop procedures to recover funds determined to have been spent in a manner inconsistent with this chapter and Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) of Chapter 2 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 50, Sec. 15.5.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16924.

The Controller shall distribute to hospitals the funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter within 60 days from the effective date of this chapter provided that the office has certified that the hospital is in compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Rural Health Services [16930. - 16939.]

16930.

(a) (1) There is in the County Health Services Fund, created pursuant to Section 16803, the Rural Health Services Account.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, “account” means the account created by paragraph (1).

(b) All money appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be deposited in the account.

(c) The department shall administer moneys deposited in the account on an accrual basis, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in this chapter, those moneys shall not be transferred to any other fund or account except for purposes of investment, as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 33.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16931.

(a) Funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be used to enhance and maintain rural health services provided by counties, hospitals, physicians, and other providers of services to patients who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment will not be made through any private coverage or by any program funded in whole or in part by the federal government.

(b) The requirements of Sections 16804.1 and 16818 apply to services supported by funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, the authority of each county established pursuant to Section 16817 shall remain unaffected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 34.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16931.5.

The county may reimburse for emergency services provided by a physician in a standby emergency room in a hospital specified in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 491.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16932.

The department shall allocate money derived from the Hospital Services Account in the fund to each county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 in the following manner:

(a) The combined total of hospital uncompensated care costs for all county and noncounty hospitals in each county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 shall be calculated by using the definitions, procedures, and data elements specified in Section 16945.

(b) (1) The office shall determine each county’s 1989–90 fiscal year share by using the 1988 calendar year data, as adjusted by the office, existing on the statewide file on September 1, 1989.

(2) The office shall determine each county’s share for the fiscal years after the 1989–90 fiscal year by using the data from the quarterly reports for the calendar year preceding the fiscal year, as adjusted by the office and existing on the statewide file on April 15 immediately preceding the fiscal year.

(3) The office shall determine each county’s share based on that county’s total hospital uncompensated care costs, divided by the total hospital uncompensated care costs for all counties that are eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809, and by multiplying that product by the amount appropriated from the Hospital Services Account in the fund for purposes of this chapter.

(4) The amounts calculated pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) shall be each county’s allocation from the total amount available for allocation to the counties under this chapter.

(c) The amounts calculated pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall be divided and allocated in accordance with Section 16946. Sections 16946, 16947, 16948, and 16949 shall be applicable to counties and hospitals receiving these funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 21.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16933.

(a) The department shall distribute those moneys appropriated from the Physician Services Account and the Unallocated Account in the fund to counties that are eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 on the basis of the percentages obtained by dividing the population of each county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 by the total population of all counties that are eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809, as reported in the most recent annual Department of Finance Research Unit report E-1.

(b) Each county shall use moneys allocated from the Unallocated Account in the fund pursuant to, and for the purposes specified in, Article 4 (commencing with Section 16960) of Chapter 5, and to expand emergency medical transportation services.

(c) Counties shall use moneys allocated from the Physician Services Account in the fund the following ways to provide medically necessary emergency, obstetric, or pediatric services, or all of them, to patients who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment will not be made through any private coverage or by any program funded in whole or in part by the federal government:

(1) Establishment and administration of a Physician Services Account in the county emergency medical services fund in accordance with Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 16951) of Chapter 5.

(2) Contracting with the department for the administration of all Physician Services Account moneys specified in this subdivision pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16952.

(3) The reimbursement or support of services, either directly or by contract, which are provided by physicians or groups of physicians.

(d) Moneys allocated from the Physician Services Account in the fund shall be used to provide reimbursement for services provided on or after July 1, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 22.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16933.1.

Any physician who receives funds pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16933 shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 16955.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16931.1 (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 430, Sec. 5.   Effective July 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16934.

(a) As a condition of receiving funds under this chapter, a county shall provide, or arrange and pay for, medically necessary followup treatment, including necessary followup dental services and prescription drugs, for any condition detected as part of a child health and disability prevention screen for a child eligible for services under Section 104395 of the Health and Safety Code, if the child was screened by the county, or upon referral by a child health and disability prevention program provider. This section shall not apply to any child eligible to receive care with no share of cost under the Medi-Cal program or who is covered by another publicly funded program or for whom these services are covered or will be paid by any other responsible party. A county may require that hospitals that contract with the county pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946, physicians who contract with the county pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 16933 or dentists or any provider that contracts with the county pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16933 and receives funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter to participate in complying with this section. A county shall not require that hospitals receiving an allocation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 or physicians who receive payment from a physician services account established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 16933 participate in complying with this section.

(b) Dental services provided pursuant to this section shall be at least equal in scope and frequency to dental services available to Medi-Cal eligible children of the same age. 

(c) Counties shall implement this section in consultation and coordination with their child health and disability prevention programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 492.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16934.2.

(a) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, a county shall not have the option to contract with the department for payment for treatment of children required pursuant to Section 16934. However, a county may elect to limit its liability for payment of that treatment to 15 percent of the amount the county actually received under this chapter for the 1989–90 fiscal year. Any county which elects to establish a 15 percent reserve shall notify the department within 45 days of the effective date of this section of its intention. A county electing to limit its liability pursuant to this section shall reserve 15 percent of the amount it received, if the county contracts with the department for administration of its physician services account pursuant to Section 16935. If the county does not contract with the department to administer its physician services account, the county’s liability shall be 15 percent of the total allocation it received under this chapter. Payment for service provided between July 1, 1989 and June 30, 1990, pursuant to Section 16934 which exceeds the amount reserved shall be the responsibility of the state, provided that the county provides documentation that it established a 15 percent reserve and met its applicable 15 percent obligation for services provided pursuant to Section 16934. The state shall recoup any funds remaining in the 15 percent reserve which were not expended and shall use the funds to pay for treatment services required under Section 16934 in future years.

(1) A county which elects not to establish a 15 percent reserve pursuant to subdivision (a), or fails to notify the department of its intention to participate, shall retain full liability for the payment of treatment of children required pursuant to Section 16934.

(2) In addition to contractual and other arrangements with providers, the county, or the department under this subdivision, pursuant to the obligation under Section 16934, may refer a child in need of inpatient care to children’s hospitals which have received funding under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16996), if the child meets the hospital’s specific criteria for inpatient care. The county or the department shall be under no obligation to reimburse the children’s hospital for these services.

(b) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, the department shall establish a separate Rural Health Services Reinsurance Account within the County Health Services Fund. For purposes of this chapter “reinsurance account” means the account established pursuant to this section.

(1) Moneys appropriated by the Legislature to establish the reinsurance account shall be deposited in the reinsurance account.

(2) Moneys deposited into the reinsurance account shall be used to pay for services provided pursuant to Section 16934 in those counties which have expended their 15 percent reserves established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) Any moneys remaining in the reinsurance account after June 30, 1990, which have not been expended or encumbered shall be transferred to the CHDP Treatment Account established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16934.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 30.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16934.5.

(a) For the 1990–91 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, each county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 may enter into a contract with the department in which the department agrees to assume the responsibility to pay for the cost of treatment service provided on or after July 1, 1990, to children pursuant to Section 16934. If a county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 does not apply for or rescinds its application for funds under this chapter, the department may use all or part of that county’s allocation, as calculated pursuant to paragraph (3), to pay for the costs of treatment services to children pursuant to Section 16934.

(1) Each county intending to contract with the department shall submit to the department a notice of intent to contract adopted by the board of supervisors no later than June 1, 1990. For each fiscal year thereafter a notice adopted by the board of supervisors shall be submitted no later than April 1 of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the agreement will be in effect, in accordance with procedures established by the department. As a condition of contracting with the department, the department may establish uniform standards, forms, and procedures for the processing and payment of claims for treatment services.

(2) (A) Each county contracting with the department pursuant to this subdivision for the 1991–92 fiscal year that has previously contracted with the department pursuant to this section shall agree that the department shall retain 10 percent of the allocation it would otherwise have received under this chapter. The department shall transfer amounts retained on a monthly basis to the CHDP Treatment Account established in subdivision (b).

(B) Any county that contracts with the department pursuant to this subdivision during the 1991–92 fiscal year that has not previously contracted with the department pursuant to this section shall agree that the department shall retain 20 percent of the allocation the county would otherwise have received under this chapter for that portion of the year for which it contracts under this section.

(3) In future fiscal years the percentage retained by the department may be adjusted to reflect actual payments, projected expenditures, funds appropriated by the Legislature for treatment services, and the overall status of the account established in subdivision (b).

(b) Beginning with the 1990–91 fiscal year, the department shall establish a separate Child Health and Disability Prevention Treatment Account. For purposes of this chapter “CHDP Treatment Account” means the account established pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) The following funds shall be deposited into the CHDP Treatment Account:

(A) Funds appropriated by the Legislature to fund the reinsurance account established in subdivision (b) of Section 16934.2 which are not expended or encumbered for that purpose.
